Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1230
Explosives control; permit; denial; notice; appeal.

Whenever the Nebraska State Patrol denies an application for a permit or the renewal thereof, the Nebraska State Patrol shall, within twenty days of such denial, give notice thereof and the reasons therefor in writing to the applicant, personally or by mail, to the address given in the application. The notice of denial shall also advise the applicant of his or her right to appeal and set forth the steps necessary to undertake an appeal and the time limits pertaining thereto. Such denial may be appealed to the Nebraska State Patrol which shall follow the procedures for contested cases required by the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 262;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 9.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.